Florida, session 2026, SB764.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âHIV Prevention 31 Justice Act.â 32 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (11) of section 33 381.0041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 34 381.0041âDonation and transfer of human tissue; testing 35 requirements.â 36 (11) 37 (b)âExcept when the donation is deemed medically 38 appropriate by a licensed physician, any person who has human 39 immunodeficiency virus infection, who knows he or she is 40 infected with human immunodeficiency virus, and who has been 41 informed that he or she may communicate this disease by donating 42 blood, plasma, organs, skin, or other human tissue who donates 43 blood, plasma, organs, skin, or other human tissue for use in 44 another person commits a misdemeanor of the first is guilty of a 45 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 46 or, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 47 Section 3.âSection 384.23, Florida Statutes, is reordered 48 and amended to read: 49 384.23âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 50 (2)(1)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 51 (1)(2)ââCounty health departmentâ means agencies and 52 entities as designated in chapter 154. 53 (3)ââSexual conductâ means conduct between persons, 54 regardless of gender, which is capable of transmitting a 55 sexually transmissible disease, including, but not limited to, 56 contact between a: 57 (a)âPenis and a vulva or an anus; or 58 (b)âMouth and a penis, a vulva, or an anus. 59 (4)ââSexually transmissible diseaseâ means a bacterial, 60 viral, fungal, or parasitic disease determined by rule of the 61 department to be sexually transmissible, to be a threat to the 62 public health and welfare, and to be a disease for which a 63 legitimate public interest will be served by providing for 64 prevention, elimination, control, and treatment. The department 65 must, by rule, determine which diseases are to be designated as 66 sexually transmissible diseases and shall consider the 67 recommendations and classifications of the Centers for Disease 68 Control and Prevention and other nationally recognized medical 69 authorities in that determination. Not all diseases that are 70 sexually transmissible need be designated for the purposes of 71 this act. 72 (5)ââSubstantial risk of transmissionâ means a reasonable 73 probability of disease transmission as proven by competent 74 medical evidence. 75 Section 4.âSection 384.24, Florida Statutes, is amended to 76 read: 77 384.24âUnlawful acts.â 78 (1)âIt is unlawful for any person who has chancroid, 79 gonorrhea, granuloma inguinale, lymphogranuloma venereum, 80 genital herpes simplex, chlamydia, nongonococcal urethritis 81 (NGU), pelvic inflammatory disease (PID)/acute salpingitis, or 82 syphilis, or human immunodeficiency virus, when such person 83 knows he or she is infected with one or more of these diseases 84 and when such person has been informed that he or she may 85 communicate this disease to another person through sexual 86 conduct intercourse, to act with the intent to transmit the 87 disease, to engage in have sexual conduct that poses a 88 substantial risk of transmission to another person when the 89 intercourse with any other person is unaware that the person is 90 a carrier of the disease, and to transmit the disease to the, 91 unless such other person has been informed of the presence of 92 the sexually transmissible disease and has consented to the 93 sexual intercourse. 94 (2)âA person does not act with the intent required under 95 subsection (1) if he or she in good faith complies with a 96 treatment regimen prescribed by his or her health care provider 97 or with the behavioral recommendations of his or her health care 98 provider or public health officials to limit the risk of 99 transmission or if he or she offers to comply with such 100 behavioral recommendations but such offer is rejected by the 101 other person with whom he or she is engaging in sexual conduct. 102 For purposes of this subsection, the term âbehavioral 103 recommendationsâ includes, but is not limited to, the use of a 104 prophylactic device to limit the risk of transmission of the 105 disease. Evidence of the personâs failure to comply with such a 106 treatment regimen or such behavioral recommendations is not, in 107 and of itself, sufficient to establish that he or she acted with 108 the intent required under subsection (1) It is unlawful for any 109 person who has human immunodeficiency virus infection, when such 110 person knows he or she is infected with this disease and when 111 such person has been informed that he or she may communicate 112 this disease to another person through sexual intercourse, to 113 have sexual intercourse with any other person, unless such other 114 person has been informed of the presence of the sexually 115 transmissible disease and has consented to the sexual 116 intercourse. 117 Section 5.âSubsections (1), (2), (4), (5), and (6) of 118 section 384.34, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 119 384.34âPenalties.â 120 (1)âAny person who violates s. 384.24 the provisions of s. 121 384.24(1) commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable 122 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 123 (2)âAny person who violates the provisions of s. 384.26 or 124 s. 384.29 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable 125 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 126 (4)âAny person who violates the provisions of the 127 departmentâs rules pertaining to sexually transmissible diseases 128 may be punished by a fine not to exceed $500 for each violation. 129 Any penalties enforced under this subsection shall be in 130 addition to other penalties provided by this chapter. The 131 department may enforce this section and adopt rules necessary to 132 administer this section. 133 (5)âAny person who violates s. 384.24(2) commits a felony 134 of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 135 775.083, or s. 775.084. Any person who commits multiple 136 violations of s. 384.24(2) commits a felony of the first degree, 137 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 138 (6)âAny person who obtains information that identifies an 139 individual who has a sexually transmissible disease, who knew or 140 should have known the nature of the information, and who 141 maliciously, or for monetary gain, disseminates this information 142 or otherwise makes this information known to any other person, 143 except by providing it either to a physician or nurse employed 144 by the Department of Health or to a law enforcement agency, 145 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 146 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 147 Section 6.âSubsections (1), (3), and (6) of section 148 775.0877, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 149 775.0877âCriminal transmission of HIV; procedures; 150 penalties.â 151 (1)âIn any case in which a person has been convicted of or 152 has pled nolo contendere or guilty to, regardless of whether 153 adjudication is withheld, any of the following offenses, or the 154 attempt thereof, which offense or attempted offense involves the 155 transmission of body fluids, with the exception of saliva, from 156 one person to another: 157 (a)âSection 794.011, relating to sexual battery; 158 (b)âSection 826.04, relating to incest; 159 (c)âSection 800.04, relating to lewd or lascivious offenses 160 committed upon or in the presence of persons less than 16 years 161 of age; 162 (d)âSections 784.011, 784.07(2)(a), and 784.08(2)(d), 163 relating to assault; 164 (e)âSections 784.021, 784.07(2)(c), and 784.08(2)(b), 165 relating to aggravated assault; 166 (f)âSections 784.03, 784.07(2)(b), and 784.08(2)(c), 167 relating to battery; 168 (g)âSections 784.045, 784.07(2)(d), and 784.08(2)(a), 169 relating to aggravated battery; 170 (h)âSection 827.03(2)(c), relating to child abuse; 171 (i)âSection 827.03(2)(a), relating to aggravated child 172 abuse; 173 (j)âSection 825.102(1), relating to abuse of an elderly 174 person or disabled adult; 175 (k)âSection 825.102(2), relating to aggravated abuse of an 176 elderly person or disabled adult; 177 (l)âSection 827.071, relating to sexual performance by 178 person less than 18 years of age; 179 (m)âSections 796.07 and 796.08, relating to prostitution; 180 (n)âSection 381.0041(11)(b), relating to donation of blood, 181 plasma, organs, skin, or other human tissue; or 182 (n)(o)âSection 787.06(3)(b), (d), (f), and (g) and (5), 183 relating to human trafficking, 184 185 the court shall order the offender to undergo HIV testing, to be 186 performed under the direction of the Department of Health in 187 accordance with s. 381.004, unless the offender has undergone 188 HIV testing voluntarily or pursuant to procedures established in 189 s. 381.004(2)(h)6. or s. 951.27, or any other applicable law or 190 rule providing for HIV testing of criminal offenders or inmates, 191 subsequent to her or his arrest for an offense enumerated in 192 paragraphs (a)-(m) (a)-(n) for which she or he was convicted or 193 to which she or he pled nolo contendere or guilty. The results 194 of an HIV test performed on an offender pursuant to this 195 subsection are not admissible in any criminal proceeding arising 196 out of the alleged offense. 197 (3)âAn offender who has undergone HIV testing pursuant to 198 subsection (1), and to whom positive test results have been 199 disclosed pursuant to subsection (2), who commits a second or 200 subsequent offense enumerated in paragraphs (1)(a)-(m) (1)(a) 201 (n), commits criminal transmission of HIV, a misdemeanor of the 202 first felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 203 775.082 or, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. A person may be convicted 204 and sentenced separately for a violation of this subsection and 205 for the underlying crime enumerated in paragraphs (1)(a)-(m) 206 (1)(a)-(n). 207 (6)âFor an alleged violation of any offense enumerated in 208 paragraphs (1)(a)-(m) (1)(a)-(n) for which the consent of the 209 victim may be raised as a defense in a criminal prosecution, it 210 is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating this section 211 that the person exposed knew that the offender was infected with 212 HIV, knew that the action being taken could result in 213 transmission of the HIV infection, and consented to the action 214 voluntarily with that knowledge. 215 Section 7.âParagraph (e) of subsection (3) of section 216 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 217 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 218 chart.â 219 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 220 (e)âLEVEL 5 221 222 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 223 316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury, failure to stop; leaving scene. 224 316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 225 316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel; obtaining fuel fraudulently. 226 322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor vehicle with suspended license, resulting in death or serious bodily injury. 227 327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury; leaving scene. 228 365.172â(14)(b)2. 2nd Misuse of emergency communications system resulting in death. 229 379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to: willful molestation of stone crab traps, lines, or buoys; illegal bartering, trading, or sale, conspiring or aiding in such barter, trade, or sale, or supplying, agreeing to supply, aiding in supplying, or giving away stone crab trap tags or certificates; making, altering, forging, counterfeiting, or reproducing stone crab trap tags; possession of forged, counterfeit, or imitation stone crab trap tags; and engaging in the commercial harvest of stone crabs while license is suspended or revoked. 230 379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a commercial harvesterâs spiny lobster trap, line, or buoy. 231 379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more undersized spiny lobsters. 232 381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs knowing HIV positive. 233 440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workersâ compensation coverage. 234 440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the purpose of making workersâ compensation claims. 235 440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false, misleading, or incomplete information with the purpose of avoiding or reducing workersâ compensation premiums. 236 624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a certificate or authority; premium collected $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 237 626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized insurer; repeat offender. 238 790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a concealed firearm. 239 790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge destructive device. 240 790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, or use of firearms in violent manner. 241 790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled shotgun or machine gun. 242 790.23 2nd Felons in possession of firearms, ammunition, or electronic weapons or devices. 243 796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a prostitute; 1st offense. 244 800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct; offender less than 18 years of age. 245 800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition; offender 18 years of age or older. 246 806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or dispense fire bomb with intent to damage any structure or property. 247 810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism dissemination. 248 810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or subsequent offense. 249 810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain minor victims. 250 812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft from 20 or more dwellings or their unenclosed curtilage, or any combination. 251 812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $10,000 or more but less than $50,000. 252 812.015â(8)(a) & (c)-(e) 3rd Retail theft; property stolen is valued at $750 or more and one or more specified acts. 253 812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts within specified period. 254 812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with specified number of other persons. 255 812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or trafficking in. 256 812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets. 257 812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching. 258 812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or conducting a chop shop. 259 817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value $20,000 to $50,000. 260 817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 261 817.2341(1),â(2)(a) & (3)(a) 3rd Filing false financial statements, making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity. 262 817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal identification information; value of benefit, services received, payment avoided, or amount of injury or fraud, $5,000 or more or use of personal identification information of 10 or more persons. 263 817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 264 817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent use of scanning device, skimming device, or reencoder. 265 825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition in the presence of an elderly person or disabled adult. 266 828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent to inflict intense pain, serious physical injury, or death. 267 836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes for financial gain a sexually explicit image of an identifiable person without consent. 268 839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an individual in the care and custody of a state agency involving great bodily harm or death. 269 843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to person; resist arrest with violence. 270 847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition using computer; offender 18 years or older. 271 847.0137â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of pornography by electronic device or equipment. 272 847.0138â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of material harmful to minors to a minor by electronic device or equipment. 273 874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting another to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 274 874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 years of age to join a criminal gang. 275 893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs). 276 893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis (or other s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 277 893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of university. 278 893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 279 893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of public housing facility. 280 893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 281 893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 282 Section 8.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (2) and 283 paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 960.003, Florida 284 Statutes, are amended to read: 285 960.003âHepatitis and HIV testing for persons charged with 286 or alleged by petition for delinquency to have committed certain 287 offenses; disclosure of results to victims.â 288 (2)âTESTING OF PERSON CHARGED WITH OR ALLEGED BY PETITION 289 FOR DELINQUENCY TO HAVE COMMITTED CERTAIN OFFENSES.â 290 (a)âIn any case in which a person has been charged by 291 information or indictment with or alleged by petition for 292 delinquency to have committed any offense enumerated in s. 293 775.0877(1)(a)-(m) s. 775.0877(1)(a)-(n), which involves the 294 transmission of body fluids from one person to another, upon 295 request of the victim or the victimâs legal guardian, or of the 296 parent or legal guardian of the victim if the victim is a minor, 297 the court shall order such person to undergo hepatitis and HIV 298 testing within 48 hours after the information, indictment, or 299 petition for delinquency is filed. In the event the victim or, 300 if the victim is a minor, the victimâs parent or legal guardian 301 requests hepatitis and HIV testing after 48 hours have elapsed 302 from the filing of the indictment, information, or petition for 303 delinquency, the testing must shall be done within 48 hours 304 after the request. 305 (b)âHowever, when a victim of any sexual offense enumerated 306 in s. 775.0877(1)(a)-(m) s. 775.0877(1)(a)-(n) is under the age 307 of 18 at the time the offense was committed or when a victim of 308 any sexual offense enumerated in s. 775.0877(1)(a)-(m) s. 309 775.0877(1)(a)-(n) or s. 825.1025 is a disabled adult or elderly 310 person as defined in s. 825.1025 regardless of whether the 311 offense involves the transmission of bodily fluids from one 312 person to another, then upon the request of the victim or the 313 victimâs legal guardian, or of the parent or legal guardian, the 314 court shall order such person to undergo hepatitis and HIV 315 testing within 48 hours after the information, indictment, or 316 petition for delinquency is filed. In the event the victim or, 317 if the victim is a minor, the victimâs parent or legal guardian 318 requests hepatitis and HIV testing after 48 hours have elapsed 319 from the filing of the indictment, information, or petition for 320 delinquency, the testing must shall be done within 48 hours 321 after the request. The testing must shall be performed under the 322 direction of the Department of Health in accordance with s. 323 381.004. The results of a hepatitis and HIV test performed on a 324 defendant or juvenile offender pursuant to this subsection are 325 not shall not be admissible in any criminal or juvenile 326 proceeding arising out of the alleged offense. 327 (3)âDISCLOSURE OF RESULTS.â 328 (a)âThe results of the test must shall be disclosed no 329 later than 2 weeks after the court receives such results, under 330 the direction of the Department of Health, to the person charged 331 with or alleged by petition for delinquency to have committed or 332 to the person convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for any 333 offense enumerated in s. 775.0877(1)(a)-(m) s. 775.0877(1)(a) 334 (n), which involves the transmission of body fluids from one 335 person to another, and, upon request, to the victim or the 336 victimâs legal guardian, or the parent or legal guardian of the 337 victim if the victim is a minor, and to public health agencies 338 pursuant to s. 775.0877. If the alleged offender is a juvenile, 339 the test results must shall also be disclosed to the parent or 340 guardian. When the victim is a victim as described in paragraph 341 (2)(b), the test results must also be disclosed no later than 2 342 weeks after the court receives such results, to the person 343 charged with or alleged by petition for delinquency to have 344 committed or to the person convicted of or adjudicated 345 delinquent for any offense enumerated in s. 775.0877(1)(a)-(m) 346 s. 775.0877(1)(a)-(n), or s. 825.1025 regardless of whether the 347 offense involves the transmission of bodily fluids from one 348 person to another, and, upon request, to the victim or the 349 victimâs legal guardian, or the parent or legal guardian of the 350 victim, and to public health agencies pursuant to s. 775.0877. 351 Otherwise, hepatitis and HIV test results obtained pursuant to 352 this section are confidential and exempt from the provisions of 353 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution and 354 shall not be disclosed to any other person except as expressly 355 authorized by law or court order. 356 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.